Hawaii statutes.
§147-37 Duties of department; violations;
proceedings; penalties. (a) It shall be the duty of the department to
administer and enforce the provisions of this part and rules promulgated
thereunder.

(b) In respect of violations or complaints of
violation of this part or rules adopted by the department pursuant thereto, the
department shall have all the rights and powers conferred upon it by section
147-2, with respect to violations or complaints of violation of part I or rules
adopted by the department pursuant thereto; and all remedies, procedures, or
actions contained in section 147-2 for violations or complaints of violation of
part I or rules adopted by the department thereunder, shall be severally and
respectively conferred, granted, practiced, and exercised for violations or
complaints of violation of the provisions of this part or rules adopted by the
department pursuant thereto. [L 1959, c 267, pt of §2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; am L 1963, c 114, §1 and c 193, §11; Supp, §22-26.8;
HRS §147-37; am L 1983, c 257, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next